Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 10
INSPECTION OF BOOKS AND RECORDS

44-10-1001. Inspection procedures.

Each licensee shall keep a complete set of all records necessary to show fully the business transactions of the licensee, all of which are open at all times during business hours for the inspection and examination by the state licensing authority or its duly authorized representatives. The state licensing authority may require any licensee to furnish such information as it considers necessary for the proper administration of this article 10 and may require an audit to be made of the books of account and records on such occasions as it may consider necessary by an auditor to be selected by the state licensing authority who shall likewise have access to all books and records of the licensee, and the expense thereof must be paid by the licensee.

The licensed premises, including any places of storage where regulated marijuana or regulated marijuana products are stored, cultivated, sold, dispensed, or tested are subject to inspection by the state or local licensing authority, or local jurisdictions and their investigators, during all business hours and other times of apparent activity, for the purpose of inspection or investigation. Access is required during business hours for examination of any inventory or books and records required to be kept by the licensees. When any part of the licensed premises consists of a locked area, upon demand to the licensee, such area must be made available for inspection without delay, and, upon request by authorized representatives of the state or local jurisdiction, the licensee shall open the area for inspection.

Each licensee shall retain all books and records necessary to show fully the business transactions of the licensee for a period of the current tax year and the three immediately prior tax years.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2932, § 5, effective January 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 44-12-701 and 44-11-701 as they existed prior to 2020.